Hawaii statutes.
§286-45 Records of county finance director.
The director of finance shall file each application received and register the
vehicle therein described in a record or book to be kept by the director of
finance under the following headings:

(1) Vehicle registration number;

(2) Name of owner; and

(3) Vehicle identification number.

The director of finance may microfilm vehicle
registration and ownership records which are a year old and may discard the
original records. The director of finance may discard vehicle registration and
ownership records which are older than six years. [L 1929, c 197, §§4, 5; RL
1935, §2668; RL 1945, §7339; RL 1955, §160-5; am L 1959, c 87, §1; am L 1967, c
61, §1; HRS §286-45; am L l969, c 268, §1; am L 1970, c 73, §1(b); gen ch 1985;
am L 1998, c 234, §§2, 29; am L 1999, c 263, §2; am L 2000, c 240, §§2, 21; am
L 2001, c 55, §12; am L 2002, c 58, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next